Utah statutes.
13-45-205.   Changes to information in a credit report subject to a security freeze.

(1)  If a credit report is subject to a security freeze, a consumer reporting agency shall notify the consumer who is the subject of the credit report within 30 days if the consumer reporting agency changes the consumer's:

(a)  name;

(b)  date of birth;

(c)  Social Security number; or

(d)  address.

(2) (a)  Notwithstanding Subsection (1), a consumer reporting agency may make technical modifications to information in a credit report that is subject to a security freeze without providing notification to the consumer.

(b)  Technical modifications under Subsection (2)(a) include:

(i)  the addition or subtraction of abbreviations to names and addresses; and

(ii)  transpositions or corrections of incorrect numbering or spelling.

(3)  When providing notice of a change of address under Subsection (1), the consumer reporting agency shall provide notice to the consumer at both the new address and the former address.



Enacted by Chapter 344, 2006 General Session

